Tennessee, session 114, HB1552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-38-601(6), is amended by
deleting "parent, or" and substituting "parent, sibling, or".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-38-603, is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(5) Registry of persistent domestic violence offenders, compiled in chapter 39,
part 4 of this title.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-38-604(b)(4), is amended by
deleting "within this state".
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1552
010266
- 1 -